Utah statutes.
78B-6-122.5.   Effect of out-of-state paternity adjudication, declaration,
or acknowledgment.
Unless a person who is an unmarried biological father has fully and strictly
complied with the requirements of Sections 78B-6-120 through 78B-6-122, an
out-of-state order that adjudicates paternity, or an out-of-state declaration
or acknowledgment of paternity:
(1)  only has the effect of establishing that the person is an unmarried
biological father of the child to whom the order, declaration, or
acknowledgment relates; and
(2)  does not entitle the person to:
(a)  notice of any judicial proceeding related to the adoption of the child;
(b)  the right to consent, or refuse to consent, to the adoption of the child;
or
(c)  the right to custody of, control over, or visitation with the child.
